src/adv-sma-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! First comes the continuation lexicon, in order to see it easier

LEXICON adv
+Adv: FINAL1 ;

LEXICON adv-interr-rel
+Adv: FINAL1 ; ! We go for the sme way of doing things.
!+Adv+Interr:0
!+Adv+Rel:0

LEXICON laakanlex
:#laakan adv ;
+Use/Sub:-laakan adv ;

LEXICON ligkelex
:#ligke adv ;
+Use/Sub:-ligke adv ;


! Then comes the Adverb lexicon itself. There are many (sub)regular adverbial
! case patterns here, they are not encoded in the present system.

LEXICON Adverb
aajmone:aajmone adv ; 
aanteges:aanteges adv ;
aarehke:aarehke adv ;
aarjeleslaakan:aarjeles laakanlex ; 
aassjoelaakan:aassjoe laakanlex ;
aehtjielaakan:aehtjie laakanlex ; 
aejlieslaakan:aejlies laakanlex ;
aelhkieslaakan:aelhkies laakanlex ; 
aerebi+Use/Sub:aerebi adv ; !
aktelen:aktelen adv ;
aktesi-aktesi:aktesi-aktesi adv ;
aktivyöki:akti#vyöki adv ;
almene:almene adv ;
almetjenligke:almetjen ligkelex ; 
alvaslaakan:alvas laakanlex ;
alvoeslaakan:alvoes laakanlex ; 
avtelen:avtelen adv ;
baaltes:baaltes adv ;
beelhtennuelesne:beelhten#nuelesne adv ;
bijjelen:bijjelen adv ; 
boelvhjöölki:boelvh#jöölki adv ;
boerehkelaakan:boerehke laakanlex ; 
buerebelaakan:buerebe laakanlex ; 
buerielaakan:buerie laakanlex ; 
buertiebealese:buertie#bealese adv ;
båadtsåejjien:båadts#åejjien adv ;
båajhtahligke:båajhtah ligkelex ; 
båajhtoehlaakan:båajhtoeh laakanlex ; 
båastahligke:båastah ligkelex ; 
båastoehlaakan:båastoeh laakanlex ; 
bååjhtide:bååjhtide adv ;
bïegkeraejkien:bïegke#raejkien adv ;
bïhteleslaakan:bïhteles laakanlex ; 
daajvaj:daajvaj adv ;
daanbien:daan#bien adv ;
daebpielistie:daebpielistie adv ;
daesnie:daesnie adv ;
dajka:dajka adv ;
davhkesmieresne:davhkes#mieresne adv ;
dejpeli:dejpeli adv ;
dlie:dlie adv ;
dogkoe:dogkoe adv ;
dossjes:dossjes adv ; 
dubpielisnie:dubpielisnie adv ; 
duekelen:duekelen adv ;
dujmieslaakan:dujmies laakanlex ; 
dujmiesligke:dujmies ligkelex ; 
dåajmetjelaakan:dåajmetje laakanlex ; 
dåajmijeslaakan:dåajmijes laakanlex ;
dåajmijslaakan:dåajmijs laakanlex ; 
dæjmatjasse:dæjmatjasse adv ;
eadtjohkelaakan:eadtjohke laakanlex ;
ebrien:ebrien adv ; ! i dette regnet
eenselaakan:eense laakanlex ; 
eensilaakan:eensi laakanlex ; 
ektesevyöki:ektese#vyöki adv ;
faagkan:faagkan adv ;
fraksoehlaakan:fraksoeh laakanlex ; 
fïere:fïere adv ; 
gaagneslaakan:gaagnes laakanlex ; 
gaajehlaakan:gaajeh laakanlex ; 
gaajhkelaakan:gaajhke laakanlex ; 
gaartesne:gaartesne adv ;
garrebhlaakan:garrebh laakanlex ;
gaskeraejesne:gaske#raejesne adv ;
geehpeslaakan:geehpes laakanlex ; 
geehpesligke:geehpes ligkelex ; 
geeruvisnie:geeruvisnie adv ;
geervelaakan:geerve laakanlex ; 
geerveligke:geerve ligkelex ; 
geesjelelaakan:geesjele laakanlex ; 
gellielaakan:gellie laakanlex ; 
gellienlaakan:gellien laakanlex ; 
giedtjh:giedtjh adv ;
gietskiebistie:gietskiebistie adv ;
gogkoe:gogkoe adv-interr-rel ; ! váccán dagkoe, gogkoe don vázzet 
gomtehkeligke:gomtehke ligkelex ;
goske:goske adv-interr-rel ; ! mon boadán, gosse don boadát
gosse:gosse adv-interr-rel ; ! mon boadán, gosse don boadát
gossege:gossege adv ; 
gubpede:gubpede adv-interr-rel ;
gubpene:gubpene adv-interr-rel ;
guektielistie:guektielistie adv ;
guhkie:guhkie adv ;
guktie:guktie adv-interr-rel ; !slik som/at
gusnie:gusnie adv-interr-rel ;
gustie:gustie adv-interr-rel ;
guvhth:guvhth adv ;
gåabpah:gåabpah adv-interr-rel ;
gåabph:gåabph adv-interr-rel ; !! <== why no case?
gåabpoeh:gåabpoeh adv-interr-rel ;
gåaph:gåaph adv-interr-rel ;
gåarhmahligke:gåarhmah ligkelex ; 
gåarhmoehlaakan:gåarhmoeh laakanlex ; 
gåebpelen:gåebpelen adv ; 
gåårelaakan:gååre laakanlex ;
gællan:gællan adv ;
gïemhpeslaakan:gïemhpes laakanlex ; 
gïemhpesligke:gïemhpes ligkelex ; 
gïjredaelvege:gïjre#daelvege adv ;
haaksoehlaakan:haaksoeh laakanlex ; 
habjoehlaakan:habjoeh laakanlex ; 
hagloehlaakan:hagloeh laakanlex ; 
halke:halke adv ;
hamhpoehlaakan:hamhpoeh laakanlex ; 
hampasligke:hampas ligkelex ; 
hearvenlaakan:hearven laakanlex ; 
heevenlaakan:heeven laakanlex ; 
hijvenlaakan:hijven laakanlex ; 
hijvenligke:hijven ligkelex ; 
hïervenlaakan:hïerven laakanlex ; 
iemielaakan:iemie laakanlex ; 
ijtjeligke:ijtje ligkelex ;
ikte:ikte adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
inhtselaakan:inhtse laakanlex ;
inhtsie:inhtsie adv ;
ipmieslaakan:ipmies laakanlex ;
jaksoemieresne:jaksoe#mieresne adv ;
jeatjahlaakan:jeatjah laakanlex ;
jeatjahligke:jeatjah ligkelex ;
jeatjhlaakan:jeatjh laakanlex ;
jielijelaakan:jielije laakanlex ;
jiesken:jiesken adv ;
jilliebaase:jilliebaase adv ; ! lenger mot vest
jirredeaereden:jirrede#aereden adv ;
jissehtslaakan:jissehts laakanlex ; 
jissehtsligke:jissehts ligkelex ; 
joekehtslaakan:joekehts laakanlex ; 
jov:jov adv ;
jååkten:jååkten adv ;
klåadtahlaakan:klåadtah laakanlex ; 
klåadtoehlaakan:klåadtoeh laakanlex ; 
kranhtjode:kranhtjode adv ;
kråavhtjahligke:kråavhtjah ligkelex ; 
kråavhtjoehlaakan:kråavhtjoeh laakanlex ; 
laakan: laakanlex ; ! need to able second word in compounds
laedtielaakan:laedtie laakanlex ;
lavladahken:lavladahken adv ; ! østavind
lulvnie:lulvnie adv ;
luvliebaase:luvliebaase adv ; !lenger østerover
luvlielisnie:luvlielisnie adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
lyjhkedelaakan:lyjhkede laakanlex ; 
lyjhkelaakan:lyjhke laakanlex ; 
lyövlehkelaakan:lyövlehke laakanlex ; 
lyövleslaakan:lyövles laakanlex ;
lyövlesligke:lyövles ligkelex ; 
læjhkan:læjhkan adv ;
maaje:maaje adv ;
madtanlaakan:madtan laakanlex ;
madtegelaakan:madtege laakanlex ;
meatan:meatan adv ;
miehtjielisnie:miehtjielisnie adv ; 
minngebe:minngebe adv ; !XXX from dict, check!
minngielisnie:minngielisnie adv ;
mojhteleslaakan:mojhteles laakanlex ; 
molsehthlaakan:molsehth laakanlex ;
muerhkieslaakan:muerhkies laakanlex ; 
muvhtine:muvhtine adv ;
mådtanlaakan:mådtan laakanlex ; 
mådtanligke:mådtan ligkelex ;
mådtegelaakan:mådtege laakanlex ;
måedtielaakan:måedtie laakanlex ;
måhtsode:måhtsode adv ;
namhtegh:namhtegh adv ;
njaelkieslaakan:njaelkies laakanlex ; 
njaelkiesligke:njaelkies ligkelex ;
njoektjelen:njoektjelen adv ; 
noerhtedhvearelden:noerhtedh#vearelden adv ;
noerhteli:noerhteli adv ; ! nordafor (flere steder)
nualan:nualan adv ; 
nåakelaakan:nåake laakanlex ; !XXX from dict, check!
nåakeligkie:nåake#ligkie adv ;
oktebisnie:oktebisnie adv ;
oktemisnie:oktemisnie adv ; 
ovmessielaakan:ovmessie laakanlex ;
ovtetje:ovtetje adv ;
praaretje:praaretje adv ;
raavsoeslaakan:raavsoes laakanlex ;
radtjoeslaakan:radtjoes laakanlex ;
radtsoehlaakan:radtsoeh laakanlex ;
reakta:reakta adv ; 
riektslaakan:riekts laakanlex ;
riktilaakan:rikti laakanlex ;
rovkijelaakan:rovkije laakanlex ;
råågkehkelaakan:råågkehke laakanlex ;
rærvode:rærvode adv ;
saahtlaakan:saaht laakanlex ;
saarvehkelaakan:saarvehke laakanlex ; !XXX from dict, check!
saemielaakan:saemie laakanlex ;
seajka:seajka adv ;
seammalaakan:seamma laakanlex ;
seammaligke:seamma ligkelex ;
searrode:searrode adv ;
sisnjielistie:sisnjielistie adv ;
sjeavodslaakan:sjeavods laakanlex ;
sjiehteleslaakan:sjiehteles laakanlex ;
skræjresne:skræjresne adv ;
slassoehlaakan:slassoeh laakanlex ; 
slassoehligke:slassoeh ligkelex ;
slåvhtjode:slåvhtjode adv ;
sneehpeslaakan:sneehpes laakanlex ;
soejmetjelaakan:soejmetje laakanlex ;
soejmetjilaakan:soejmetji laakanlex ;
soejmilaakan:soejmi laakanlex ;
striengkieslaakan:striengkies laakanlex ;
strïenjelaakan:strïenje laakanlex ;
stïeresne:stïeresne adv ;
sueledslaakan:sueleds laakanlex ;
sïejhmede:sïejhmede adv ;
tjaebpieslaakan:tjaebpies laakanlex ; 
tjaebpiesligke:tjaebpies ligkelex ;
tjaekedsligke:tjaekeds ligkelex ; 
tjaekeresligke:tjaekeres ligkelex ;
tjarke:tjarke adv ;
tjerkeme:tjerkeme adv ;
tjiehpieslaakan:tjiehpies laakanlex ; 
tjiehpiesligke:tjiehpies ligkelex ;
tjirkeslaakan:tjirkes laakanlex ; 
tjirkesligke:tjirkes ligkelex ;
tjåenghkesne adv ; !XXX from dict, check! Lene: Commented this one in again - there are 17 of this one in Rørossamiske tekster
tjïelkelaakan:tjïelke laakanlex ;
utne:utne adv ;
veajkoej:veajkoej adv ;
veaksehkelaakan:veaksehke laakanlex ;
vestiesligke:vesties ligkelex ;
vietseleslaakan:vietseles laakanlex ; 
vietselsligke:vietsels ligkelex ;
viht:viht adv ;
vuelhtie:vuelhtie adv ;
vueriedisnie:vueriedisnie adv ;
vyörtegslaakan:vyörtegs laakanlex ; 
vååjnoes:vååjnoes adv ;
vædtsoehlaakan:vædtsoeh laakanlex ;
væjsehkelaakan:væjsehke laakanlex ;
vïssjelsligke+Use/Sub:vïssjels ligkelex ; !
åabrelen:åabrelen adv ;
åajvahlaakan:åajvah laakanlex ;
åarjelde:åarjelde adv ; ! fra syd, sønnafor
åenehkslaakan:åenehks laakanlex ;
åhtjetje:åhtjetje adv ;
ånnetje:ånnetje adv ;
åvtine:åvtine adv ; 
